Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2238
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Act, the definitions found in sections 81-2239 to 81-2248 shall be used.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 3.